src/fst/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
!! # Meänkieli numerals

!! This file documents [the file for Meänkieli numerals](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-fit/blob/main/src/fst/stems/numerals.lexc).


!! These are taken from fkv, but originally from fin, an FST with **very** different ways of doing things.

LEXICON Numeral 
!!≈ __@LEXNAME@__ 

!! Numerals have been split in three sections, the compounding parts
!! of cardinals and ordinals, and the non-compounding ones:
!!€gt-norm: Numeral
!!€ kaksikymmentäkolmetuhatta: kaksi+Num+Sg+Nom#kymmenen+Num+Sg+Par#kolme+Num+Sg+Nom#tuhat+Num+Sg+Par ! 23,000
!!€ kakskymmentäkolmetuhatta: kaksi+Num+Sg+Nom#kymmenen+Num+Sg+Par#kolme+Num+Sg+Nom#tuhat+Num+Sg+Par
!!€ kahessaasneljes: kahes+A+Ord+Sg+Nom#saas+A+Ord+Sg+Nom#neljes+A+Ord+Sg+Nom  ! 204rd
!!€ viitisenkymmentä: viitisen+Num#kymmentä  ! 50-ish

0    NUM_CARD_ALL    ;
0    NUM_ORD_ALL ;
0    NUM_OTHERS  ;

 +Use/Circ: ARABICS ;          ! for the arabic numerals        !
 +Use/Circ: ROMAN ;           ! for the roman numerals         !
 +Use/Circ: NUM-PREFIXES ;    ! for §34 etc.                   !
 +Use/Circ: ISOLATED-NUMEXP ; ! for ½ etc.                     !

LEXICON NUM_OTHERS
!!≈ __@LEXNAME@__ 

!! There is a set of numbers or corresponding expressions that work like them,
!! but are not basic cardinals or ordinals:
!!€gt-norm: Numeral others
!!€ viitisenkymmentä: viitisen+Num#kymmentä
yksisen+Num#:yksisen#  NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
kaksisen+Num#:kaksisen#    NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
yhtisen+Num#:yhtisen#  NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
kahtisen+Num#:kahtisen#    NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
kolmisen+Num#:kolmisen#    NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
nelisen+Num#:nelisen#  NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
viitisen+Num#:viitisen#    NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
kuutisen+Num#:kuutisen#    NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
seittemisen+Num#:seittemisen#  NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
kaheksisen+Num#:kaheksisen#  NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
yheksisen+Num#:yheksisen#    NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
pari+Num:par           NUM_PARI ;

!! ## Numeral stem variation
!! Numerals follow the same stem variation patterns as nouns, some of these
!! being very rare to extinct for nouns. 
LEXICON NUM_YKSI
!!≈ __@LEXNAME@__ 

!!€gt-norm: Numerals 31
!!€ yksi: yksi+Num+Sg+Nom
!!€ yks: yksi+Num+Sg+Nom !sallima puhekieliset haamut ko "yks" ja "kaks"
!!€ yhtheen: yksi+Num+Sg+Ill
!!€ yhtenä: yksi+Num+Sg+Ess
!!€ yhessä: yksi+Num+Sg+Ine
!!€ yhelä: yksi+Num+Sg+Ade
!!€ yhtä: yksi+Num+Sg+Par
!!€ yksii: yksi+Num+Pl+Par
!!€ yksiin: yksi+Num+Pl+Gen
!!€ ykshiin: yksi+Num+Pl+Ill
!!€ yksinä: yksi+Num+Pl+Ess
!!€ yksissä: yksi+Num+Pl+Ine
0:ks   NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;
+Use/NG:ksi   NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ; 
0:ht    NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HEEN    ;
0:hte   NUM_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS   ;
0:hte   NUM_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS_NA ;
0:he   NUM_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:he   NUM_FRONT_SINGULARS_L     ;
0:h     NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ   ;
0:ks    NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_II   ;
0:ks    NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IIN   ;
0:ks    NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HIIN   ;
0:ks    NUM_FRONT_PLURALS ;
0:ks    NUM_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS_N ; 
0:ks    NUM_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS_L ;

LEXICON NUM_KAKSI
!!≈ __@LEXNAME@__ 
!!€gt-norm: Numerals 31 back§
!!€ kaksi: kaksi+Num+Sg+Nom
!!€ kaks: kaksi+Num+Sg+Nom !sallima puhekieliset haamut ko "yks" ja "kaks"
!!€ kahtheen: kaksi+Num+Sg+Ill
!!€ kahtena: kaksi+Num+Sg+Ess
!!€ kahessa: kaksi+Num+Sg+Ine
!!€ kahela: kaksi+Num+Sg+Ade
!!€ kahta: kaksi+Num+Sg+Par
!!€ kaksii: kaksi+Num+Pl+Par
!!€ kaksiin: kaksi+Num+Pl+Gen
!!€ kakshiin: kaksi+Num+Pl+Ill
!!€ kaksina: kaksi+Num+Pl+Ess
!!€ kaksissa: kaksi+Num+Pl+Ine
0:ks   NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
+Use/NG:ksi   NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE ; 
0:ht    NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_HEEN    ;
0:hte   NUM_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS   ;
0:hte   NUM_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS_NA ;        
0:he   NUM_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:he   NUM_BACK_SINGULARS_L     ;
0:h     NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA   ;
0:ks    NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_II   ;
0:ks    NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IIN   ;
0:ks    NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_HIIN  ;
0:ks    NUM_BACK_PLURALS ;
0:ks    NUM_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS_N ;
0:ks    NUM_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS_L ;

LEXICON NUM_KOLME
!!≈ __@LEXNAME@__ 
!!€gt-norm: Numerals 8~5
!!€ kolme: kolme+Num+Sg+Nom
!!€ kolmheen: kolme+Num+Sg+Ill
!!€ kolhmeen: kolme+Num+Sg+Ill
!!€ kolmena: kolme+Num+Sg+Ess
!!€ kolmessa: kolme+Num+Sg+Ine
!!€ kolmela: kolme+Num+Sg+Ade
!!€ kolmee: kolme+Num+Sg+Par
!!€ kolmii: kolme+Num+Pl+Par
!!€ kolmiin: kolme+Num+Pl+Gen
!!€ kolmhiin: kolme+Num+Pl+Ill
!!€ kolhmiin: kolme+Num+Pl+Ill
!!€ kolmina: kolme+Num+Pl+Ess
!!€ kolmissa: kolme+Num+Pl+Ine
0:e     NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0       NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_HEEN    ;
0:e     NUM_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:e     NUM_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS_NA ; 
0:e     NUM_BACK_SINGULARS_L     ;
0:e     NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_E ;
0       NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_II ;
0       NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IIN ;
0       NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_HIIN ;
0       NUM_BACK_PLURALS ; 
0       NUM_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS_N ;
0       NUM_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS_L ;

LEXICON NUM_NELJÄ
!!≈ __@LEXNAME@__ 
!!€gt-norm: Numerals 10
!!€ neljä: neljä+Num+Sg+Nom
!!€ neljän: neljä+Num+Sg+Gen
!!€ neljää: neljä+Num+Sg+Par
!!€ neljhään: neljä+Num+Sg+Ill
!!€ neljänä: neljä+Num+Sg+Ess
!!€ neljässä: neljä+Num+Sg+Ine
!!€ neljälä: neljä+Num+Sg+Ade
!!€ neljiä: neljä+Num+Pl+Par
!!€ neljhiin: neljä+Num+Pl+Gen
!!€ neljien: neljä+Num+Pl+Gen !harvinainen muoto
!!€ neljhiin: neljä+Num+Pl+Ill
!!€ neljinä: neljä+Num+Pl+Ess
!!€ neljissä: neljä+Num+Pl+Ine
0:ä  NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;
!+Err/Orth:e  NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;
0   NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HÄÄN   ;
0:ä  NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:ä  NUM_FRONT_SINGULARS   ;
0:ä  NUM_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS_NA ;
0:ä  NUM_FRONT_SINGULARS_L     ;
0:ä  NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_E   ;
0    NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_II   ;
0    NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IIN   ;
0    NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HIIN   ;
0    NUM_FRONT_PLURALS ;
0    NUM_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS_N ;
0    NUM_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS_L ;

LEXICON NUM_VIISI
!!≈ __@LEXNAME@__ 
!!€gt-norm: Numerals 27 front
!!€ viisi: viis+Num+Sg+Nom
!!€ viis: viis+Num+Sg+Nom
!!€ viitheen: viis+Num+Sg+Ill
!!€ viittä: viis+Num+Sg+Par
!!€ viiessä: viis+Num+Sg+Ine
!!€ viielä: viis+Num+Sg+Ade
!!€ viitenä: viis+Num+Sg+Ess
!!€ viisissä: viis+Num+Pl+Ine
!!€ viissii: viis+Num+Pl+Par
!!€ viissiin: viis+Num+Pl+Gen
!!€ viitten: viis+Num+Pl+Gen !harvinainen muoto
!!€ viishiin: viis+Num+Pl+Ill
!!€ viisinä: viis+Num+Pl+Ess
0:s    NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;
+Use/NG:s  NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ; 
0:t     NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HEEN    ;
0:te    NUM_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS   ;
0:te    NUM_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS_NA ;
0:e    NUM_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:e    NUM_FRONT_SINGULARS_L     ;
0:s     NUM_FRONT_PLURALS ;
0:s     NUM_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS_N ;
0:s     NUM_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS_L ;
0:t     NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ   ;
0:t     NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:ss    NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_II   ;
0:ss    NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IIN   ;
0:s     NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HIIN  ;

LEXICON NUM_KUUSI
!!≈ __@LEXNAME@__ 
!!€gt-norm: Numerals 27 back
!!€ kuusi: kuus+Num+Sg+Nom
!!€ kuus: kuus+Num+Sg+Nom
!!€ kuutta: kuus+Num+Sg+Par
!!€ kuutena: kuus+Num+Sg+Ess
!!€ kuuessa: kuus+Num+Sg+Ine
!!€ kuuela: kuus+Num+Sg+Ade
!!€ kuusina: kuus+Num+Pl+Ess
!!€ kuusissa: kuus+Num+Pl+Ine
!!€ kuussii: kuus+Num+Pl+Par
!!€ kuussiin: kuus+Num+Pl+Gen
!!€ kuutten: kuus+Num+Pl+Gen !harvinainen muoto
!!€ kuushiin: kuus+Num+Pl+Ill
0:s    NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
+Use/NG:s   NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE ; 
0:t     NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_HEEN    ;
0:te    NUM_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS   ;
0:te    NUM_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS_NA ; 
0:e    NUM_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:e    NUM_BACK_SINGULARS_L     ;
0:s     NUM_BACK_PLURALS ;
0:s     NUM_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS_N ;
0:s     NUM_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS_L ;
0:t     NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA   ;
0:t     NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:ss    NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_II   ;
0:ss    NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IIN   ;
0:s     NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_HIIN  ;

LEXICON NUM_CARD_ALL
yksi+Num:y             NUM_YKSI  ;
kaksi+Num:ka           NUM_KAKSI ;
kolme+Num:kolm         NUM_KOLME ;
neljä+Num:nelj         NUM_NELJÄ ;
viis+Num:vii          NUM_VIISI ;
kuus+Num:kuu          NUM_KUUSI ;
